Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.050

Demonstration projects. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

(1) In addition to a competitive process, demonstration projects are provided to determine the feasibility of the local infrastructure financing tool. Notwithstanding RCW 39.102.040, the board shall approve each demonstration project. Demonstration project applications must be received by the board no later than July 1, 2008. The Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project award shall not exceed one million dollars per year, the Spokane river district project award shall not exceed one million dollars per year, and the Vancouver riverwest project award shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars per year. The board shall approve by September 15, 2007, demonstration project applications submitted no later than July 1, 2007. The board shall approve by September 18, 2008, demonstration project applications submitted by July 1, 2008.

(2) If before board approval of the final competitive project award in 2008, a demonstration project has not received approval by the board, the state dollars set aside for the demonstration project in subsection (1) of this section shall be available for the competitive application process. If a demonstration project has received a partial award before the approval of the final competitive project award, the remaining state dollars set aside for the demonstration project in subsection (1) of this section shall be available for the competitive process.

[ 2007 c 229 s 3; 2006 c 181 s 203.]

NOTES:

Application—Severability—2007 c 229: See notes following RCW 39.102.020.